North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 8. Public Warehouses.

§ 66-35.
Who may become public warehousemen.

Any person or any corporation organized under the laws of this State whose charter authorizes it to engage in the business of a warehouseman may become a public warehouseman and authorized to keep and maintain public warehouses for the storage of cotton, goods, wares, and other merchandise as hereinafter prescribed upon giving the bond hereinafter required.

History.

1901, c. 678; Rev., s. 3029; 1919, c. 212; C.S., s. 5118.

§ 66-36.
Bond required.

Every person or every corporation organized under

G.S. 66-35

, to become a public warehouseman, except such as shall have a capital stock of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall give bond in a reliable bonding or surety company, or an individual bond with sufficient sureties, payable to the State of North Carolina, in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), to be approved, filed with and recorded by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the warehouse is located, for the faithful performance of the duties of a public warehouseman; but if such person or corporation has a capital stock of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), then it shall not be required to give the bond mentioned in this section.

History.

1901, c. 678, s. 2; 1905, c. 540; Rev., s. 3030; 1908, c. 56; 1919, c. 212; C.S., s. 5119.

§ 66-37.
Person injured may sue on bond.

Whenever such warehouseman fails to perform any duty or violates any of the provisions of this Article, any person injured by such failure or violation may bring an action in his name and to his own use in any court of competent jurisdiction on the bond of said warehouseman.

History.

1901, c. 678, s. 3; Rev., s. 3031; C.S., s. 5120.

§ 66-38.
When insurance required; storage receipts.

Every such warehouseman shall, when requested thereto in writing by a party placing property with it on storage, cause such property to be insured; every such warehouseman shall give to each person depositing property with it for storage a receipt therefor.

History.

1901, c. 678, s. 4; 1905, c. 540, s. 2; Rev., s. 3032; C.S., s. 5121.

Cross References.

As to warehouse receipts, see Chapter 27.

§ 66-39.
Books of account kept; open to inspection.

Every such warehouseman shall keep a book in which shall be entered an account of all its transactions relating to warehousing, storing, and insuring cotton, goods, wares and merchandise, and to the issuing of receipts therefor, which books shall be open to the inspection of any person actually interested in the property to which such entry relates.

History.

1901, c. 678, s. 7; Rev., s. 3035; C.S., s. 5122.

§ 66-40.
Unlawful disposition of property stored.

If any person unlawfully sells, pledges, lends, or in any other way disposes of or permits or is a party to the unlawful selling, pledging, lending, or other disposition of any goods, wares, merchandise, or anything deposited in a public warehouse, without the authority of the party who deposited the same, he shall be punished by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) and by imprisonment in the State’s prison for not more than three years; but no officer, manager, or agent of such public warehouse shall be liable to the penalties provided in this section unless, with the intent to injure or defraud any person, he so sells, pledges, lends, or in any other way disposes of the same, or is a party to the selling, pledging, lending, or other disposition of any goods, wares, merchandise, article, or thing so deposited.

History.

1901, c. 678, s. 11; Rev., s. 3831; C.S., s. 5123.

Cross References.

As to warehouse receipts, see Chapter 27.